Georgia, session 2025_26, SB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state
board of education, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"20-2-20.1.
(a) No later than July 1, 2026, the State Board of Education shall establish an emergency
alert response system to be provided to public elementary and secondary schools in this
state that allows:
(1) School administration to notify law enforcement of threats made on or impacting a
school campus;
S. B. 54
- 1 -

LC 39 4489
(2) School administration to notify local emergency first responders of an active threat
to safety upon a school campus; and
(3) A public elementary or secondary school to communicate with neighboring local
school systems about threats made on or impacting a school campus or emergency
procedures initiated upon a school campus due to an active threat to safety.
(b) No later than July 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall establish a secure
state-wide database for use by public elementary and secondary schools in this state to
report and monitor incidents of safety threats made on or impacting a school campus. The
name of any person who threatens the safety of a school shall be included in such database;
provided, however, that no student shall be entered on any such database until the threat
to school safety has been investigated and verified by local law enforcement and the
student has been evaluated by a certificated school social worker from the local school
system, if any are employed by the school system. The State Board of Education shall
develop standards for determining when a verified threat qualifies for inclusion of a person
within the database and a method for petitioning for removal from any database developed
pursuant to this subsection. Any such removal standards shall include a required
evaluation of the student by a certified school social worker. Such database shall be
accessible only to designated personnel at each public elementary or secondary school in
this state. When a student has been added to the database established pursuant to this
subsection, the local school system shall provide the parents or guardians of the student
with recommendations for counseling services and provide the student with available
specialized mental health services while in school.
(c) The State Board of Education shall be authorized to consult with the Georgia
Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, the Georgia Bureau of
Investigation, and local boards of education and other elementary and secondary school
governing bodies for purposes of this Code section."
S. B. 54
- 2 -

LC 39 4489
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 54
- 3 -